Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,214
State Fire Marshal; establish fee schedules; administer act.

(1) The State Fire Marshal shall, after a public hearing conducted by the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee, establish a reasonable schedule of fees for licenses, permits, certificates, and inspections authorized under the Conveyance Safety Act. The State Fire Marshal shall establish the fees at a level necessary to meet the costs of administering the act. Inspection fee schedules relating to the inspection of conveyances adopted prior to January 1, 2008, shall continue to be effective until they are amended or repealed by the State Fire Marshal.

(2) The State Fire Marshal shall administer the Conveyance Safety Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding for the administration of the act shall be entirely from cash funds remitted to the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund that are fees collected in the administration of the act.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2506;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 50.